Massachusetts, session 194th, H662.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof, the following sentence:
“No person admitted to any public school shall be discriminated against in obtaining the
advantages, privileges and courses of study of such public school on account of age.”
of 1